Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-211
Failure of election officers to make returns; penalty.

Should the officers of election of any election precinct refuse or fail to make return of the votes cast for and against any proposition or proposed amendment to the Constitution, they shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1895, c. 5, § 7, p. 71;

R.S.1913, § 3708;

C.S.1922, § 3096;

C.S.1929, § 49-211;

R.S.1943, § 49-211;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 305.